Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1542
Election records and returns; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who has in his or her possession any falsely made, altered, forged, or counterfeited list of voters book, official summary of votes cast, or election returns of any election and who knows such book, summary, or election returns to be falsely made, altered, forged, or counterfeited, with the intent to hinder, defeat, or prevent a fair expression of the popular will at such election, shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 441.